District of Columbia statutes.
34-222

Repealed

“Waterpower company” defined.

Repealed.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 976, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(b)(6), 47 DCR 1091
1973 Ed., § 43-116.
1981 Ed., § 43-216.
Separability clauses, see §§ 34-405 and 34-406.
General provisions, construction and severability of law, see § 34-403.
Failure to obey Commission, penalties, see §§ 34-706 to 34-708.